Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF509.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1843HV (3) 91 lh/ko H.F. 509 Section 1. Section 225D.2, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 4A. The department shall not approve a new 3 application for the autism support program on or after July 4 1, 2025. The department shall continue to provide treatment 5 and make payments pursuant to the program for an eligible 6 individual whose application is approved on or before June 30, 7 2025, if the individual remains eligible for the program. 8 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 225D.3 Future repeal. 9 This chapter is repealed July 1, 2027. 10 Sec. 3. Section 514I.5, subsection 4, paragraph c, Code 11 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 12 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (18) Applied behavior analysis services 13 for the treatment of autism spectrum disorder. 14 Sec. 4. TRANSFER OF MONEYS. Upon repeal of chapter 225D on 15 July 1, 2027, any unencumbered and unobligated moneys remaining 16 in the autism support fund created in section 225D.2, are 17 transferred to the Hawki trust fund created in section 514I.11. 18